Washington statutes.
RCW 7.06.043

Hearing—Time, date, and place.

The arbitrator shall set the time, date, and place of the hearing and shall give reasonable notice of the hearing date to the parties. Except by stipulation or for good cause shown, the hearing shall be scheduled to take place not sooner than twenty-one days, nor later than seventy-five days, from the date of the assignment of the case to the arbitrator. The hearing shall take place in appropriate facilities provided or authorized by the court.

[ 2018 c 36 s 3.]

NOTES:

Applicability—2018 c 36: "This act applies to all cases filed on or after September 1, 2018." [ 2018 c 36 s 8.]

Effective date—2018 c 36: "This act takes effect September 1, 2018." [ 2018 c 36 s 9.]